Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 5 Assaults

11-5-1.
Assault with intent to commit specified felonies.

Every person who shall make an assault with intent to commit murder, robbery, sexual assault, burglary, or the abominable and detestable crime against nature, shall be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years nor less than one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

11-5-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 76, § 1.

11-5-2.
Felony assault.

Every person who shall make an assault or battery, or both, upon the person of another, with a dangerous weapon, or with acid or other dangerous substance, or by fire, or an assault or battery that results in serious bodily injury shall be guilty of a felony assault. If such assault results in serious bodily injury, it shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years. Every other felony assault which results in bodily injury or no injury shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than six (6) years.

Where the provisions of “The Domestic Violence Prevention Act,” chapter 29 of title 12, are applicable, the penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided in §

12-29-5

.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part, member, or organ;

Causes serious permanent disfigurement or circumcises, excises, or infibulates the whole or any part of the labia majora or labia minora or clitoris of a person; or

Results in the termination of a pregnancy where the person making the assault or battery is someone other than the pregnant person and knows or has reason to know that the person upon whom the assault or battery is made is pregnant.

This section shall not apply to acts committed by:

Any person relating to the performance of an abortion pursuant to chapter 4.13 of title 23, the Reproductive Privacy Act, for which the consent of the pregnant person, or a person authorized by law on her behalf, has been obtained or for which such consent is implied by law; or

Any person for any medical treatment of the pregnant person or the fetus.

“Bodily injury” means physical injury that causes physical pain, illness, or any impairment of physical condition.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 19; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 19; P.L. 1925, ch. 657, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

11-5-2

; P.L. 1981, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 8; P.L. 1990, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 27, § 3.

11-5-2.1.
Felony assault by use of devices similar in appearance to a firearm.

Every person who shall make an assault or battery, or both, with any device manufactured and designed to be substantially similar in appearance to a firearm shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years if serious injury results, and in the event that serious bodily injury does not result, punishment shall be imprisonment for not more than three (3) years.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part, member or organ; or

Causes serious permanent disfigurement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 604, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 324, § 1.

11-5-2.2.
Battery — Criminal negligence.

When serious bodily injury, as defined in §

11-5-2

, of any person, occurs as a proximate result of criminal negligence, the person committing the criminal negligence shall be guilty of battery and shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years or fined not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

For the purposes of this section: (i) “Criminal negligence” shall mean: Conduct which is such a departure from what would be that of an ordinary prudent or careful person in the same circumstance as to be incompatible with a proper regard for human life or an indifference to consequences. Criminal negligence is negligence that is aggravated, culpable or gross; (ii) “Person” shall mean an individual or any business entity recognized by the laws of the state of Rhode Island including, but not limited to, corporations, limited liability corporations, partnerships or limited liability partnerships.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 204, § 1.

11-5-2.3.
Domestic assault by strangulation.

Every person who shall make an assault or battery, or both, by strangulation, on a family or household member as defined in subsection

12-29-2(b)

, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years.

Where the provisions of “The Domestic Violence Prevention Act,” chapter 29 of title 12, are applicable, the penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided in §

12-29-5

.

“Strangulation” means knowingly and intentionally impeding normal breathing or circulation of the blood by applying pressure on the throat or neck or by blocking the nose or mouth of another person, with the intent to cause that person harm.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 284, § 1.

11-5-3.
Simple assault or battery.

Except as otherwise provided in §

11-5-2

, every person who shall make an assault or battery or both shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

Where the provisions of “The Domestic Violence Prevention Act”, chapter 29 of title 12, are applicable, the penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided in §

12-29-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 20; C.P.A. 1905, § 1171; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

11-5-3

; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 8; P.L. 1992, ch. 329, § 1.

11-5-3.1.
Assault or battery upon delivery person.

“Delivery person” means any person engaged in the commercial delivery of any item, food product, or anything else of value to any home, residence, or business.

Every person who shall make an assault or battery upon any delivery person in the execution of the delivery person’s duty shall be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) years or fined not exceeding three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.

Every person who shall make an assault or battery, or both, with a dangerous weapon, or with acid or other dangerous substance, or by fire, or an assault or battery that results in serious bodily injury, to any delivery person shall be punished by imprisonment for a period of not less than five (5) years, but not more than twenty (20) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 437, § 1.

11-5-4.
Assault with dangerous weapon in dwelling house.

Whoever, being armed with a dangerous weapon, assaults another with intent to rob or murder, shall, if the assault is committed within a dwelling house, be punished by imprisonment in the adult correctional institution for not less than ten (10) years to life.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 4.

11-5-5.
Assault of police officers and other officials.

Any person who shall make an assault or battery, or both, by knowingly and willfully either (1) striking, or (2) spraying with a noxious chemical, commonly used as a personal defense weapon, including Mace and an oleoresin capsicum product or like products, a uniformed member of the state police or metropolitan park police, environmental police officer, state properties patrol officer, probation and parole officers, state government case worker or investigator, judge of the supreme, superior, family, district court, traffic tribunal or municipal court, deputy sheriff, city or town police officer or firefighter, member of the capitol police, member of campus security force of state colleges and universities, member of the Rhode Island airport police department, member of the Rhode Island fugitive task force, Rhode Island public transit authority bus driver, or on-duty plainclothes member of the town, city, or state police force, investigator of the department of the attorney general appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

, or member of the railroad police after proper identification is displayed, or uniformed dog officer, or out-of-state police officer called into Rhode Island under a cooperative agreement to provide mutual aid at the request of the state of Rhode Island pursuant to chapter 37 of title 42, or assistant attorney general or special assistant attorney general, or employees of the department of environmental management responsible for administrative inspections or any constable authorized by chapter 45-16 of the Rhode Island general law causing bodily injury while the officer or official is engaged in the performance of his or her duty, shall be deemed to have committed a felony, and shall be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) years, or fined not exceeding fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 428, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 152, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 491, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 29.

11-5-6.
Assault and battery in the collection of a loan.

Any person who commits an assault and battery upon another for the purpose of collecting any loan shall be punished upon the first conviction by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years and upon a second or subsequent conviction by imprisonment for not less than three (3) years nor more than ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 264, § 1.

11-5-7.
Assault of schoolteachers, school officials or other school department employees.

Any person who shall knowingly and willfully strike a schoolteacher, student teacher, school security officer or school administrator, causing bodily injury, while the teacher, student teacher, security officer, administrator, or school department employee is engaged in the performance of his or her duty, shall be deemed to have committed a felony, and shall be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) years, or fined not exceeding fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 1.

11-5-8.
Assault on correctional officer, or training school employee.

Any person who shall knowingly and willfully strike a uniformed member of the correctional officer staff at the adult correctional institutions causing bodily injury, or willfully strikes a member who is out of uniform, knowing the person to be such a member, while the member is engaged in the performance of his or her duty, or who knowingly and without consent removes or attempts to remove a firearm from a correctional officer engaged in the lawful performance of his or her duties, or who knowingly and willfully strikes a training school employee at the training school for youth, causing bodily injury to the employee while the employee is engaged in the performance of his or her duty, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 138, § 1.

11-5-8.1.
Assault with bodily fluid.

Any person incarcerated or in custody at a state correctional facility including the juvenile training school who shall knowingly and willfully commit an assault upon a correctional officer or any other employee of the department of corrections with any bodily fluid, while the employee is engaged in the performance of his or her duty, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 35, § 1.

11-5-9.
Repealed.

11-5-10.
Assault on persons 60 years of age or older causing bodily injury.

Any person who shall commit an assault and battery upon a person sixty (60) years of age or older, causing bodily injury, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 158, § 1.

11-5-10.1.
Assault on persons 60 years of age or older causing serious bodily injury.

Any person who shall commit an assault or battery, or both, upon a person sixty (60) years of age or older, causing serious bodily injury, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned for not less than three (3) years but not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both. Every person so convicted shall be ordered to make restitution to the victim of the offense or to perform up to five hundred (500) hours of public community restitution work or attend violence counseling and/or substance abuse counseling, or any combination of them imposed by the sentencing judge. The court may not waive the obligation to make restitution and/or public community restitution work. The restitution and/or public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part, member or organ; or

Causes serious permanent disfigurement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 491, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

11-5-10.2.
Assault on persons with severe impairments causing serious bodily injury.

Any person who shall commit an assault or battery, or both, upon a person, with severe impairments causing serious bodily injury, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned for not less than two (2) years but not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both. Every person so convicted shall be ordered to make restitution to the victim of the offense or to perform up to five hundred (500) hours of public community restitution work, or both, or any combination of them imposed by the sentencing judge. The court may not waive the obligation to make restitution and/or public community restitution work. The restitution and/or public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death, serious disfigurement;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part, member or organ; or

Causes serious permanent disfigurement.

For the purposes of this section:

“Adult” means a person over the age of eighteen (18).

“Major life activities” means: (i) mobility; (ii) self-care; (iii) communication; (iv) receptive and/or expressive language; (v) learning; (vi) self-direction; (vii) capacity for independent living; or (viii) economic self-sufficiency.

“Person with severe impairments” means a child or adult who has a disability which is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments and results in substantial functional limitations in one or more major life activities.

Violations of this section shall be reported to the local police department.

After July 1, 2007 pursuant to §

40-8.5-2

, the local police department may request the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals provide crisis intervention services for the adult victim with severe impairments when:

Necessary to ensure the immediate health and safety of the adult victim;

The adult victim relies on the person believed to have committed the assault and/or battery, for assistance in performing three (3) or more major life activities; and

After the victim is informed of his or her right to refuse crisis intervention and/or supportive services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 422, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 1.

11-5-10.3.
Assault on persons 60 years of age or older by caretaker causing bodily injury.

Any person who shall commit an assault and battery upon a person sixty (60) years of age or older, causing bodily injury, and who was, at the time of the assault and battery, responsible for the care and treatment of the victim, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or fined not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or both. Further, if at the time of the assault and battery the person committing the act was employed by a health care facility that either condoned the act or attempted to conceal it, the health care facility shall be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 442, § 1.

11-5-10.4.
Assault on persons 60 years of age or older by caretaker causing serious bodily injury.

Any person who shall commit an assault or battery, or both, upon a person sixty (60) years of age or older, causing serious bodily injury, and who was, at the time of the assault and battery, responsible for the care and treatment of the victim, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned for not less than two (2) years but not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both. Further, if at the time of the assault and battery the person committing the act was employed by a health care facility that either condoned the act or attempted to conceal it, the health care facility shall be fined not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). Every person so convicted shall be ordered to make restitution to the victim of the offense or to perform up to five hundred (500) hours of public community restitution work or attend violence counseling and/or substance abuse counseling, or any combination of them imposed by the sentencing judge. The court may not waive the obligation to make restitution and/or public community restitution work. The restitution and/or public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part, member or organ; or

Causes serious permanent disfigurement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

11-5-11.
Assault on persons with severe impairments.

For the purposes of this section:

“adult” means a person over the age of eighteen (18).

“major life activities” means: (i) mobility; (ii) self-care; (iii) communication; (iv) receptive and/or expressive language; (v) learning; (vi) self-direction; (vii) capacity for independent living; or (viii) economic self-sufficiency.

“person with severe impairments” means a child or adult who has a disability which is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments which results in a substantial limitation on the person’s ability to function independently in the family or community and in one or more major life activities.

Any person who shall commit an assault and battery upon a person who is severely impaired as defined in subsection (a) of this section, causing bodily injury, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or fined not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both.

Violations of this section shall be reported to the local police department.

After July 1, 2007 pursuant to §

40-8.5-2

, the local police department may request the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals provide crisis intervention services for the adult victim with severe impairments when:

Necessary to ensure the immediate health and safety of the adult victim;

The adult victim relies on the person believed to have committed the assault and/or battery, for assistance in performing three (3) or more major life activities; and

After the victim is informed of his or her right to refuse crisis intervention and/or supportive services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 445, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 10; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 10; P.L. 2006, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 1.

11-5-12.
Abuse, neglect and/or exploitation of adults with severe impairments.

Any person primarily responsible for the care of an adult with severe impairments who shall willfully and knowingly abuse, neglect or exploit that adult shall be subject to a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or both, and ordered to make full restitution of any funds as the result of any exploitation which results in the misappropriation of funds. Every person convicted of or placed on probation for violation of this section shall be ordered by the sentencing judge to attend appropriate professional counseling to address his or her abusive behavior.

As used in this section:

“Abuse” means the subjection of an adult with a severe impairment to willful infliction of physical pain, willful deprivation of services necessary to maintain the physical or mental health of the person, or unreasonable confinement.

“Adult with severe impairments” means a person over the age of eighteen (18) who has a disability which is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments and results in substantial functional limitations in one or more of the following areas of major life activity: (i) mobility; (ii) self-care; (iii) communication; (iv) receptive and/or expressive language; (v) learning; (vi) self-direction; (vii) capacity for independent living; or (viii) economic self-sufficiency.

“Exploitation” means an act or process of taking pecuniary advantage of impaired persons by use of undue influence, harassment, duress, deception, false representation, false pretenses, or misappropriation of funds.

“Neglect” means the willful refusal to provide services necessary to maintain the physical or mental health of an adult with severe impairments.

“Person primarily responsible for care” or “caregiver” means any person who is for a significant period of time the primary caregiver or is primarily responsible for the management of the funds of an adult with severe impairments.

Violations of this section shall be reported to the local police department.

After July 1, 2007 pursuant to §

40-8.5-2

, the local police department may request the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals provide crisis intervention services for the adult victim with severe impairments when:

necessary to ensure the immediate health and safety of the adult victim;

the adult victim relies on the person believed to have committed the abuse, neglect and/or exploitation, for assistance in performing three (3) or more major life activities; and

After the victim is informed of his or her right to refuse crisis intervention and/or supportive services.

Any person who fails to report known or suspected abuse or neglect shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to apply to the discontinuance of life-support systems or life-sustaining treatment for an adult for whom, if the treatment were terminated, death may result.

Any person participating in good faith in making a report pursuant to this chapter, excluding any perpetrator or conspirator of the acts, shall have immunity from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit the use of any medical or psychological treatment procedure designed and conducted in accordance with applicable professional standards when performed by appropriately trained personnel under the supervision of a person or facility licensed or approved by the state of Rhode Island and when any consent as is required by law has been obtained.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean a person is abused or neglected for the sole reason that the person is being furnished or relies upon treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination recognized by the laws of this state.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean a person is abused or neglected when the parent or legal guardian of an adult with severe impairments, who is the person primarily responsible for care of the adult, (1) decides, in good faith, not to accept support services from a governmental agency, which in the opinion of the parent or legal guardian and the adult, is considered to be inappropriate or inconsistent with the best interests of that adult; or (2) decides, in good faith, to reduce or discontinue assistance to that adult who is developing, acquiring or practicing independent decision-making or living skills.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 1.

11-5-13.
Repealed.

11-5-14.
Assault on child in care of department of children, youth and families.

Any employee of the department of children, youth and families, or any employee of any public or private agency with which the department contracts for services in furtherance of the care or custody of children, who shall commit an assault and battery upon a child in the care of the department shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than three (3) years but not more than ten (10) years and a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 258, § 1.

11-5-14.1.
Assault on child in care of department of children, youth and families causing serious bodily injury.

Any employee of the department of children, youth and families, or any employee of any public or private agency with which the department contracts for services in furtherance of the care or custody of children who shall commit an assault or battery upon a child in the care of the department, causing serious bodily injury, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than five (5) years but not more than twenty (20) years and a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part, member or organ; or

Causes serious permanent disfigurement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 258, § 1.

11-5-14.2.
Battery by an adult upon child ten (10) years of age or younger causing serious bodily injury.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older who shall commit a battery upon a child ten (10) years of age or younger, causing serious bodily injury, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than five (5) years but not more than twenty (20) years and a fine of not less than five thousand ($5,000) dollars nor more than twenty thousand ($20,000) dollars.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that:

Creates a substantial risk of death;

Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part, member or organ; or

Causes serious permanent disfigurement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 109, § 1.

11-5-15.
Aggravated harassment of a deputy sheriff by an inmate.

Every prisoner confined in a custodial unit of the adult correctional institutions or in the custody of the warden or other correctional employee while outside the confines of the institutions who causes or attempts to cause any deputy sheriff to come into contact with blood, seminal fluid, urine or feces, by throwing, tossing or expelling the fluid or material with the intent to harass, annoy, threaten or alarm, shall be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years, or fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 467, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 29.

11-5-16.
Assault of health care providers or emergency services medical personnel.

Any person who shall knowingly and willfully assault a health care provider and/or emergency medical services personnel while that provider is engaged in providing health care services shall be deemed to have committed a felony, and may be imprisoned no more than three (3) years and fined not more than fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500), or both.

The following terms, as used in this section, are defined as follows:

“Health care provider” has the same meaning as defined in §

5-37.3-3

and includes any personnel directed by them.

“Emergency medical services personnel” means anyone who provides emergency medical transportation services and anyone directed by them.

“Health care services” has the same meaning as defined in §

5-37.3-3

and includes any personnel directed by them.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 201, § 1.

11-5-17.
Assault or battery for purpose of causing unconsciousness.

Any person who shall make an assault or battery, or both, by causing, or attempting to cause, another person to be rendered unconscious by a single punch, kick, or other singular striking motion to the head of such person for the purpose of bringing about the loss of consciousness of such person, or who shall knowingly assist, aid, abet, solicit, encourage, counsel, command, or conspire to coerce any person to commit such an act, shall be deemed to have committed a felony and shall be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years or fined not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 483, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 546, § 1.